vec_IT/vec_IT.dic
abordir/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
ʼéa/P3P4P5I0I4	po:verb ts:indicative_imperfect st:ʼer
ʼbiàndome/P6P7P8	po:verb ts:gerund_simple is:interrogative st:aver
abiéndome/P6P7P8.0	po:verb ts:gerund_simple is:interrogative st:aver
audir/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2V0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
barbajo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0+0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:barbajar
xbiako/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:xbiakar
inbiđarir/a0a1d0d1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
bordo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0@0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:bordar
damaskar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
defamar/a0a1a2P0P1P2V0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
đaliđar/a0a1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
asiàndome/P6P7P8	po:verb ts:gerund_simple is:interrogative st:èser
exitar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
stofegar/a0a1a2P0P1P2r0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
sforacar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
ingariar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
ingaxetar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
guaskonar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
kadeno/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0+0-1*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:kadenar
karpir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2*0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
skofonar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inkòrxer/b0b1b2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
xlepar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
deliro/a0a1P0P1FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:delirar
predelíxar/b0b1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
moroxar/a0a1a2P0P1P2*0r0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
múxego/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:muxegar
negrixar/a0a1a2P0P1P2*0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
parir/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2-0-1*0r2r3	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
aparir/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2.0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
konparir/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2-1.0*0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
paređo/a0a1P0P1FSI0-1	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:paređar
partir/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2+0-1*0.0:0r0r2r3r5V0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
skonpartir/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
sospénder/b0b1b2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
pianixar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inpixolir/a0a1f0f1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inpixoƚir/a0a2f0f2P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
pole/P3P4FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:poder
poƚe/P3P5I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:poder
pòle/P3P4FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:poder
pòƚe/P3P5I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:poder
porà/P3P4P5I0I2	po:verb ts:indicative_future st:poder
poría/P3P4P5I0I2	po:verb ts:subjunctive_present st:poder
poríe/P3P4P5I0	po:verb ts:subjunctive_present st:poder
poràe/P3P4P5	po:verb ts:subjunctive_present st:poder
porave/P3P4P5	po:verb ts:subjunctive_present st:poder
inponar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inputar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
rosixo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:rosixar
rúgoƚo/a0a2P0P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:rugoƚar
singolarixar/a0a1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
solèsito/a0a1P0P1FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:solesitar
sorbir/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2@0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
spígoƚo/a0a2P0P2I0-0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:spigoƚar
stujo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:stujar
tòrme/P6P7-1.0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple is:interrogative st:tòr
còrme/P6P7-1.0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple is:interrogative st:còr
tormento/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:tormentar
intuɉar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
interséder/b0b1b2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
veròlo/a0a1P0P1FSI0Ṿŧ	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:verolar
vertir/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2+0@0:0r0r5	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
divertir/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2r0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
pervertir/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
sovertir/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
subvertir/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
investigar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
sóramene/P6P7P8	po:adverb
sóremene/P6P7P8	po:adverb
sótemene/P6P7P8	po:adverb
èkome/P6P7P8	po:adverb
darénteme/P6P7P8	po:adjective
rénteme/P6P7P8@0	po:adjective
inkontra–me/P6	po:adverb
sora–me/P6	po:adverb
darèntemene/P6P7P8	po:adverb
